Illinois, session 104th, HB4413.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Housing Development Act is amended 5by changing Section 7.28 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3805/7.28)7    Sec. 7.28. Tax credit for donation to sponsors. The 8Authority may administer and adopt rules for an affordable 9housing tax donation credit program to provide tax credits for 10donations as set forth in this Section.11    (a) In this Section:12    "Administrative housing agency" means either the Authority 13or an agency of the City of Chicago.14    "Affordable housing project" means either:15        (1) a rental project in which at least 25% of the units 16    have rents (including tenant-paid heat) that do not 17    exceed, on a monthly basis, maximum gross rent figures, as 18    published by the Authority, that are: 19            (i) based on data published annually by the U.S. 20        Department of Housing and Urban Development; 21            (ii) based on the annual income of households 22        earning 60% of the area median income; 23            (iii) computed using a 30% of gross monthly income   HB4413- 2 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1        standard; and 2            (iv) adjusted for unit size and at least 25% of the 3        units are occupied by persons and families whose 4        incomes do not exceed 60% of the median family income 5        for the geographic area in which the residential unit 6        is located; or 7        (2) a unit for sale to homebuyers whose gross 8    household income is at or below (A) 60% of the area median 9    income (for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 10    2022) or (B) 120% of the area median income (for taxable 11    years beginning on or after January 1, 2022) and who pay no 12    more than 30% of their gross household income for mortgage 13    principal, interest, property taxes, and property 14    insurance (PITI).15    "Donation" means money, securities, or real or personal 16property that is donated to a not-for-profit sponsor that is 17used solely for costs associated with either (i) purchasing, 18constructing, or rehabilitating an affordable housing project 19in this State, (ii) an employer-assisted housing project in 20this State, (iii) general operating support, or (iv) technical 21assistance as defined by this Section.22    "Employer-assisted housing project" means either 23down-payment assistance, reduced-interest mortgages, mortgage 24guarantee programs, rental subsidies, or individual 25development account savings plans that are provided by 26employers to employees to assist in securing affordable   HB4413- 3 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1housing near the workplace, that are restricted to housing 2near the workplace, and that are restricted to employees whose 3gross household income is at or below 120% of the area median 4income.5    "General operating support" means any cost incurred by a 6sponsor that is a part of its general program costs and is not 7limited to costs directly incurred by the affordable housing 8project.9    "Geographical area" means the metropolitan area or county 10designated as an area by the federal Department of Housing and 11Urban Development under Section 8 of the United States Housing 12Act of 1937, as amended, for purposes of determining fair 13market rental rates.14    "Median income" means the incomes that are determined by 15the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development 16guidelines and adjusted for family size.17    "Project" means an affordable housing project, an 18employer-assisted housing project, general operating support, 19or technical assistance.20    "Sponsor" means a not-for-profit organization that (i) is 21organized as a not-for-profit organization under the laws of 22this State or another state and (1) for an affordable housing 23project, has as one of its purposes the development of 24affordable housing; (2) for an employer-assisted housing 25project, has as one of its purposes home ownership education; 26and (3) for a technical assistance project, has as one of its   HB4413- 4 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1purposes either the development of affordable housing or home 2ownership education; (ii) is organized for the purpose of 3constructing or rehabilitating affordable housing units and 4has been issued a ruling from the Internal Revenue Service of 5the United States Department of the Treasury that the 6organization is exempt from income taxation under provisions 7of the Internal Revenue Code; or (iii) is an organization 8designated as a community development corporation by the 9United States government under Title VII of the Economic 10Opportunity Act of 1964.11    "Tax credit" means a tax credit allowed under Section 214 12of the Illinois Income Tax Act.13    "Technical assistance" means any cost incurred by a 14sponsor for project planning, assistance with applying for 15financing, or counseling services provided to prospective 16homebuyers.17    (b) A sponsor must apply to an administrative housing 18agency for approval of the project. The administrative housing 19agency must reserve a specific amount of tax credits for each 20approved project. Tax credits for general operating support 21can only be reserved as part of a reservation of tax credits 22for an affordable housing project, an employer-assisted 23housing project, or technical assistance. No tax credits shall 24be allowed for a project without a reservation of such tax 25credits by an administrative housing agency for that project.26    (c) The Authority must adopt rules establishing criteria   HB4413- 5 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1for eligible costs and donations, issuing and verifying tax 2credits, and selecting projects that are eligible for a tax 3credit.4    (d) Tax credits for employer-assisted housing projects are 5limited to that pool of tax credits that have been set aside 6for employer-assisted housing. Tax credits for general 7operating support are limited to 10% of the total tax credit 8reservation for the related project (other than general 9operating support) and are also limited to that pool of tax 10credits that have been set aside for general operating 11support. Tax credits for technical assistance are limited to 12that pool of tax credits that have been set aside for technical 13assistance.14    (e) The amount of tax credits reserved by the 15administrative housing agency for an approved project is 16limited to $32,850,352 in State fiscal years 2022 and 2023 and 17shall increase by 5% each fiscal year thereafter through 18fiscal year 2026. Beginning in State fiscal year 2027, the 19amount of tax credits reserved by the administrative housing 20agency for an approved project is limited to $41,831,227 in 21State fiscal year 2027 and shall increase by 10% each fiscal 22year thereafter. The City of Chicago shall receive 24.5% of 23total tax credits authorized for each fiscal year. The 24Authority shall receive the balance of the tax credits 25authorized for each fiscal year. The tax credits may be used 26anywhere in this State. The tax credits have the following   HB4413- 6 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1set-asides: 2        (1) for employer-assisted housing projects, $2 3    million; and 4        (2) for general operating support and technical 5    assistance, $1 million.6    The balance of the funds must be used for affordable 7housing projects. During the first 9 months of a fiscal year, 8if an administrative housing agency is unable to reserve the 9tax credits set aside for the purposes described in subsection 10(e), the administrative housing agency may reserve the tax 11credits for any approved projects.12    (f) The administrative housing agency that reserves tax 13credits for an affordable housing project must record against 14the land upon which the affordable housing project is located 15an instrument to assure that the property maintains its 16affordable housing compliance for a minimum of 10 years. The 17Authority has flexibility to assure that the instrument does 18not cause undue hardship on homeowners.19(Source: P.A. 102-175, eff. 7-29-21.) 20    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 21changing Section 214 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 5/214)23    Sec. 214. Tax credit for affordable housing donations. 24    (a) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after   HB4413- 7 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1December 31, 2001 and until the taxable year ending on 2December 31, 2036, December 31, 2026, a taxpayer who makes a 3donation under Section 7.28 of the Illinois Housing 4Development Act is entitled to a credit against the tax 5imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount 6equal to 50% of the value of the donation. For taxable years 7ending before December 31, 2023, partners, shareholders of 8subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 9companies (if the limited liability company is treated as a 10partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation) 11are entitled to a credit under this Section to be determined in 12accordance with the determination of income and distributive 13share of income under Sections 702 and 703 and subchapter S of 14the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or 15after December 31, 2023, partners and shareholders of 16subchapter S corporations are entitled to a credit under this 17Section as provided in Section 251. Persons or entities not 18subject to the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 19Section 201 and who make a donation under Section 7.28 of the 20Illinois Housing Development Act are entitled to a credit as 21described in this subsection and may transfer that credit as 22described in subsection (c).23    (b) If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 24for the year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to 25the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 26credit year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest   HB4413- 8 -LRB104 17223 HLH 31300 b1year for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits 2for more than one year that are available to offset a 3liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first.4    (c) The transfer of the tax credit allowed under this 5Section may be made (i) to the purchaser of land that has been 6designated solely for affordable housing projects in 7accordance with the Illinois Housing Development Act or (ii) 8to another donor who has also made a donation in accordance 9with Section 7.28 of the Illinois Housing Development Act.10    (d) A taxpayer claiming the credit provided by this 11Section must maintain and record any information that the 12Department may require by regulation regarding the project for 13which the credit is claimed. When claiming the credit provided 14by this Section, the taxpayer must provide information 15regarding the taxpayer's donation to the project under the 16Illinois Housing Development Act.17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-175, eff. 7-29-21; 18103-396, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.